Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202664-419
Online notarial act; validity.

No otherwise valid online notarial act performed on or after April 2, 2020, and before July 1, 2020, pursuant to the Governor's Executive Order No. 20-13, dated April 1, 2020, shall be invalidated because such act was performed prior to the operative date of Laws 2019, LB186.

Laws 2021, LB94, § 2.